Florida, session 2026, SB1276.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created 17 to read: 18 1004.0983âLimiting the number of foreign students enrolled 19 in public postsecondary educational institutions.â 20 (1)âEach Florida College System institution and state 21 university shall limit the number of enrolled students who are 22 citizens of a foreign country and who are not permanent 23 residents of the United States to no more than 10 percent of the 24 total number of students enrolled at the institution or 25 university. 26 (2)âThe State Board of Education and the Board of Governors 27 shall adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to administer 28 this section. 29 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.